apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="abboff/are__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ai</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avate</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aste</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avi</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asti</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aron</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arono</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erei</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ò</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ereste</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iamo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eresti</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ar</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erebber</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erebbero</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erebbe</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eremo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>assimo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avan</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>assi</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avano</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aste</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ava</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>assi</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asser</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>assero</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asse</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erò</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erete</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erai</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eran</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eranno</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erà</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avamo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ammo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>are</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iate</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ate</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>in</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ino</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iamo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ando</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ate</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eremmo</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ati</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ata</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ano</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ato</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abbreviazion/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aerodinamic/o__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>he</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="abolizione">
        <i>abolizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="acquisizione">
        <i>acquisizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="affiliazione">
        <i>affiliazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="alluvione">
        <i>alluvion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ape">
        <i>ap</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="assimilazione">
        <i>assimilazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="attitudine">
        <i>attitudin</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="calcolatrice">
        <i>calcolatric</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cattedrale">
        <i>cattedral</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="circoscrizione">
        <i>circoscrizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="collaborazione">
        <i>collaborazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="composizione">
        <i>composizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="concezione">
        <i>concezion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="connessione">
        <i>connession</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="contravvenzione">
        <i>contravvenzion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="corruzione">
        <i>corruzion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="decisione">
        <i>decision</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="depurazione">
        <i>depurazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diffamazione">
        <i>diffamazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="direttrice">
        <i>direttric</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="divisione">
        <i>division</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="emorroide">
        <i>emorroid</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="estate">
        <i>estat</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fluttuazione">
        <i>fluttuazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="giurisdizione">
        <i>giurisdizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="importazione">
        <i>importazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inondazione">
        <i>inondazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ipotensione">
        <i>ipotension</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lentiggine">
        <i>lentiggin</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="manipolazione">
        <i>manipolazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="munizione">
        <i>munizion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="occasione">
        <i>occasion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="partecipazione">
        <i>partecipazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="piramide">
        <i>piramid</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="previsione">
        <i>prevision</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="raggruppazione">
        <i>raggruppazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="resurrezione">
        <i>resurrezion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rivelazione">
        <i>rivelazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sospensione">
        <i>sospension</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tosse">
        <i>toss</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="vegetazione">
        <i>vegetazion</i> 
        <par n="abbreviazion/e__n" /> 
    </e>
